Vermont, session 2025-2026, H568.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 1073 is amended to read:
§ 1073. “LEGAL PUPIL” DEFINED; ACCESS TO SCHOOL
* * *
(d) If one or both of a child’s parents or guardians are being relocated to the
State under military orders, a school district shall allow registration of the
VT LEG #386214 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.568
2026 Page 2 of 3
student by mail, telephone, or electronically and shall not require the parent or
legal guardian of the student or the student themselves to physically appear at a
location within the district to register the student. Proof of required residency
shall not be required at the time of the remote registration but shall be required
within 10 days of after the student’s attendance in the school district. If the
enrolling child is transferring with a plan under Section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 20 U.S.C. § 794, or an individualized education
program, the school district shall take all steps necessary to ensure that services
comparable to those being received in the child’s previous school district are in
place not later than 30 days from when the child arrives in the school district,
including the transfer of records and any prior evaluations, the performance of
reevaluations as applicable, and the facilitation of any necessary meetings. If it
is determined that the enrolling child needs a new evaluation, such evaluation
shall take place within 30 days after the child’s enrollment in the school
district.
(e) If a child of a member of the armed forces is enrolled in a school district
and such member has received military orders directing the member to a
location outside the school district or any other documents from the armed
forces indicating a change of residency from the school district during the
school year, the child may continue to be enrolled in the child’s school of
origin, as defined in subdivision 1075(c)(1) of this title, until the end of the
VT LEG #386214 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.568
2026 Page 3 of 3
school year while such member remains a member of the armed forces;
provided, however, that any child in grade 11 may continue to be enrolled in
the child’s school of origin for an additional school year while the child’s
parent or guardian remains a member of the armed forces.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386214 v.1